Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 673B.1 Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. âAgricultural commodityâ means a farm animal or farm crop as each is defined in section 673A.3. 2. a. âAgricultural sourceâ means the location where an agricultural commodity is produced, handled, housed, stored, preserved, processed, distributed, or sold. b. âAgricultural sourceâ includes the location where an agricultural retailer or agricultural service provider conducts an activity. 3. âGreenhouse gasâ means a gas derived from human activity or a natural source that is any of the following: a. Originating from any of the following: (1) An agricultural source. (2) A petroleum source. (3) A renewable fuel source. b. Any of the following gases: (1) Carbon dioxide. (2) Hydrofluorocarbons. House File 2527, p. 2 (3) Methane. (4) Nitrogen trifluoride. (5) Nitrous oxide. (6) Sulfur hexafluoride. (7) Perfluorocarbons. 4. âPetroleum sourceâ means a location where petroleum or a petroleum product is manufactured, stored, or dispensed. 5. âRegulatory authorityâ means the department of natural resources or a federal agency regulating greenhouse gas emissions, including the United States environmental protection agency. 6. âRenewable fuel sourceâ means a location where renewable fuel, as defined in section 214A.1, is manufactured, stored, or dispensed. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 673B.2 Action based on climate ââ limitation on liability. 1. Subject to section 673B.3, in any civil or criminal action, a defendant is not liable, and is not subject to any judicial remedy, under any principle of law or equity, for damages or injury from any alleged actual or potential effect on climate caused wholly or partly by a greenhouse gas emission. 2. Subsection 1 applies regardless of the civil or criminal action brought or type of relief sought, whether legal or equitable. 3. A person bringing a civil or criminal action that alleges damages or injury as described in subsection 1 must do all of the following: a. Specify each greenhouse gas emitted by the defendant that as asserted gives rise to the civil or criminal action. b. Show by clear and convincing evidence that unavoidable and identifiable damage or injury has resulted or will result as a direct cause of the defendantâs violation of an enforceable statutory limitation or restriction or a valid, enforceable operating, air, or other permit issued to the defendant by a regulatory authority. Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 673B.3 Action based on climate ââ applicability. Section 673B.2 applies unless the district court in the House File 2527, p. 3 civil or criminal case finds by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant has violated any of the following: 1. An enforceable statutory limitation or restriction governing the emission of a specific greenhouse gas originating within this state. 2. An express term of a valid, enforceable operating, air, or other permit issued to the defendant by a regulatory authority that has jurisdiction over the defendantâs greenhouse gas emissions. Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 673B.4 Statutory construction. This chapter shall not be construed to create either a right to bring any civil or criminal action, or a judicial remedy, under any principle of law or equity, based on the potential effect on climate caused wholly or partly by a greenhouse gas emission. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2527, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor